Hawaii statutes.
§286-61 Penalty. Any person who
violates sections 286-41, 286-42, 286-44.5 to 286-56.5, and 286-58 to 286-60
shall be fined not less than $5 nor more than $1,000; provided that any
corporate owner of a motor vehicle who fails to register a motor vehicle as
required by section 286-41(a) following a transfer of the vehicle between
counties shall be fined $1,000 for each violation. Any person who violates
section 286-43, 286-44, or 286-57 shall be fined not less than $5 and not more
than $1,000 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both. [L 1929, c 197, §15;
RL 1935, §2676; RL 1945, §7348; RL 1955, §160-19; am L 1967, c 214, §6; HRS
§286-61; am L 1987, c 171, §3; am L 1993, c 214, §4]

Case Notes

Refusal to deliver certificate of ownership to transferee
entitled thereto, is misdemeanor. 38 H. 178.

Cited: 38 H. 53, 62.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next